West Virginia, session 2025, SB711.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 3. forests and wildlife areas. §20-3-3a. Cabwaylingo State Forest Trail System. (a) The director, in consultation with the forestry director, may permit all-terrain vehicles (ATVs), off-highway recreational vehicles (ORVs), and utility-terrain vehicles (UTVs) to drive on roads and trails in Cabwaylingo State Forest, as designated and approved by the director. The director may establish special seasons and designate certain campgrounds and tent sites in the forest.  (b) The director, in consultation with the forestry director, may establish a special permit for purchase by the ATV and ORV users for road and trail access, and may close any areas, or parts thereof, to public use. Should the director establish such a special permit, it shall be unlawful, at any time, to operate an ATV or ORV on any roads and trails in Cabwaylingo State Forest without the special permit.(c) The provisions of §20-15-1 et seq. of this code apply to the division, participants, outfitters, and licensees of the Cabwaylingo State Forest Trail System, though ORVs may be permitted.(d) The Parks and Recreation Section of the Division of Natural Resources is prohibited from establishing any additional ATV, ORV, or UTV trail systems within state parks and state forests: Provided, That the Director of the Division of Natural Resources shall have the authority to authorize the development and use of certain connector trails, roads, and parking areas from private systems, including, without limitation, the Hatfield-McCoy systems, solely for the purpose of providing access to state park and state forest recreational facilities and lodging by ATV, ORV, and UTV trail system users.(e)(d) The Director of the Division of Natural Resources shall have authority to promulgate emergency legislative rules and legislative rules necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section.